Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.070

Qualifications for licensure.

In order to become licensed as a home inspector, an applicant must submit the following to the department:

(1) An application on a form developed by the department;

(2) Proof of a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of classroom instruction approved by the board;

(3) Proof of up to forty hours of field training supervised by a licensed home inspector;

(4) Evidence of successful passage of the written exam as required in RCW 18.280.080; and

(5) The fee in the amount set by the department.

[ 2008 c 119 s 7.]